Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-148
General assistance; not alienable; exception.

No general assistance shall be alienable by assignment or transfer, or be subject to attachment, garnishment, or any other legal process, except that a county may pay general assistance directly to any person, corporation, or other legal entity providing goods or services, as described in section 68-133, to the poor person.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 18.